Illinois, session 104th, SB2878.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 355.5 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/355.5)7    Sec. 355.5. Dental coverage reimbursement; prohibitions. 8    (a) No insurer, dental service plan corporation, 9professional service corporation, insurance network leasing 10company, or any other company or its contracted vendor that 11amends, delivers, issues, or renews an individual or group 12policy of accident and health insurance on or after the 13effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 14Assembly the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 15103rd General Assembly shall require a dental care provider to 16only accept payment from a credit card or electronic funds 17transfer or to incur a fee to access and obtain payment or 18reimbursement for services provided.19    (b) Any insurer, dental service plan corporation, 20professional service corporation, insurance network leasing 21company, or any other company or its contracted vendor that 22amends, delivers, issues, or renews an individual or group 23policy of accident and health insurance A dental plan carrier   SB2878- 2 -LRB104 16882 BAB 30292 b1shall provide a dental care provider with 100% of the 2contracted amount of the payment or reimbursement. 3    (c) In this subsection, "express acceptance" means a clear 4and direct agreement to the terms of payment method, 5communicated explicitly by the dental plan to the dental care 6provider, in writing, signifying acceptance of the payment 7method without any ambiguity or implied actions. Any insurer, 8dental service plan corporation, professional service 9corporation, insurance network leasing company, or any other 10company or its contracted vendor that amends, delivers, 11issues, or renews an individual or group policy of accident 12and health insurance may initiate or change payment 13methodology to a dental care provider using electronic funds 14transfer payments, including virtual credit card payments, if:15        (1) the dental care provider is notified of any fees 16    associated with a particular payment method;17        (2) the insurer, dental service plan corporation, 18    professional service corporation, insurance network 19    leasing company, or other company or its contracted vendor 20    advises the dental care provider of the available methods 21    of payment and provides clear instructions to the dentist 22    as to how to select an alternative payment method that 23    does not impose fees or similar charges on the provider; 24    and25        (3) the dental care provider or a designee of the 26    provider elects, through express acceptance, to accept a   SB2878- 3 -LRB104 16882 BAB 30292 b1    payment of the claim using the credit card or electronic 2    funds transfer payment method. Violation of express 3    acceptance nullifies an election on claim payment 4    methodology until the express agreement is executed.5    (d) A dental care provider's selected form of claim 6payment methodology remains effective until the dental care 7provider chooses an alternative method of payment or a new 8contract is executed.9    (e) If a dental care provider requests a change in the 10available payment methodology, then the insurer, dental 11service plan corporation, professional service corporation, 12insurance network leasing company, or other company or its 13contracted vendor that amends, delivers, issues, or renews an 14individual or group policy of accident and health insurance 15shall implement the change within 30 business days after the 16request.17    (f) An insurer or managed care plan shall not use a dental 18care provider's preferred method of payment as a factor when 19deciding whether to provide credentials to a dentist.20    (g) A dental benefit plan or its contracted vendor or 21health maintenance organization that initiates or changes 22payments to a dentist through the Automated Clearing House 23Network in accordance with 45 CFR 162.1601 and 45 CFR 162.1602 24shall not charge a fee solely to transmit the payment to the 25dental care provider unless the dental care provider has 26consented to the fee. A dental care provider agent may charge   SB2878- 4 -LRB104 16882 BAB 30292 b1reasonable fees when transmitting an Automated Clearing House 2Network payment related to transaction management, data 3management, portal services, and other value-added services, 4in addition to bank transmittal.5    (h) The requirements of this Section shall not be waived 6by contract, and any contractual clause in conflict with the 7requirements of this Section or that purports to waive any 8requirements of this Section is void. Fees incurred directly 9by a dental care provider from third parties related to 10transmitting an automated clearing house network claim, 11transaction management, data management, or portal services 12and other fees charged by third parties that are not in the 13control of the dental plan carrier shall not be prohibited by 14this Section.15(Source: P.A. 103-24, eff. 1-1-24.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 171, 2027.